Oklahoma, session 2026, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3648.1 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created until July 1, 2031, an investment


rebate program for the cost of qualified capital expenditures, as


defined by Section 3645.3 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, by



Req. No. 682 Page 1


establishments defined by Section 3645.3 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, that:


1. Refine, manufacture, or process compounds or elements into


hydrogen-based products, including the production of blue hydrogen


through the process of autothermal reforming (ATR) and green


hydrogen through the process of electrolysis, and the refining of


domestically produced crude oil into cleaner transportation fuels in


industries defined or classified in the North American Industry


Classification System (NAICS) Manual under Subsector 324 or 325;


2. Generate and store emission free power and energy in


industries defined or classified in the NAICS Manual under Subsector


221, and water production from waste heat and ambient air; and


3. Have acquired at least a six hundred (600) acre parcel of


real property located within this state, where the qualified capital


will be located.


B. To be eligible for consideration for an investment rebate


payment awarded under the provisions of this act, the establishment


shall:


1. Submit an application and documentation to the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce, as required by the Department, outlining a


capital expenditure plan in this state associated with qualified


capital expenditures totaling no less than Seven Hundred Fifty


Million Dollars ($750,000,000.00);



Req. No. 682 Page 2


2. Have made qualified capital expenditures no less than twenty


percent (20%) of the capital expenditure plan outlined in the


application submitted by the primary establishment and approved by


the Oklahoma Department of Commerce, pursuant to the provisions of


this act; and


3. Have filed all Oklahoma tax returns and tax documents


required by law.


C. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no investment


expenditure shall be utilized for calculation purposes that results


in the qualification of more than one establishment under the


provisions of this act, for investment rebate payments based on the


same expenditure.


D. 1. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall approve or


disapprove claims for rebates and shall issue payment for all


approved claims from funds held in the Commerce Energy Manufacturing


Activity Development Fund created in Section 2 of this act.


2. The Department shall disapprove all applications and claims


or any portion of applications and claims for rebates that would


exceed the balance of available funds in the Commerce Energy


Manufacturing Activity Development Fund.


3. The total amount of applications approved and investment


rebate payments awarded under the provisions of this act shall not


exceed the total amount of monies designated by law for deposit to


the Commerce Energy Manufacturing Activity Development Fund.

Req. No. 682 Page 3


E. 1. Subject to the approval and ongoing review of the


eligibility application by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce, the


investment rebate payment authorized by this act shall be equal to


six and sixty-seven one-hundredths percent (6.67%) of the cost of


the qualified capital expenditure in the year of expenditure.


2. The Department is authorized to conditionally pre-qualify


and account for anticipated future investment rebate payments. The


Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall not pre-qualify investment


rebate payments, encumber funds, pre-encumber funds, or otherwise


allocate resources that would result in the allocation of investment


rebate payments in excess of the balance of available funds in the


Commerce Energy Manufacturing Activity Development Fund.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3648.2 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund for the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the “Commerce


Energy Manufacturing Activity Development Fund”. The fund shall be


a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies designated for deposit to the fund by law.


All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for


the purpose of paying rebates as provided in this act. Expenditures


from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State

Req. No. 682 Page 4


Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


B. All unencumbered funds remaining in the Commerce Energy


Manufacturing Activity Development Fund upon July 1, 2031, shall be


transferred to the State Treasurer for deposit in the General


Revenue Fund.


SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce for deposit in the Commerce Energy


Manufacturing Activity Development Fund, from any monies not


otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State


Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, the sum of Fifty


Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00).


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-682 QD 12/26/2024 6:17:07 PM









Req. No. 682 Page 5